Hawaii, session 2026, GM1201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that federal agricultural
grants provide financial support to Hawaii's agricultural
industry. The department of agriculture and biosecurity
actively pursues these federal grants and has recently hired a
grant writer, whose efforts have yielded great results. Since
November 2024, $8,899,450.16 in federal grant funds have been
obtained from the United States Department of Agriculture and
another $5,285,000 in grants have applications in process. Many
of the federal grants being pursued by the department provide
for indirect overhead reimbursements or an allowable management
fee to reimburse the State for costs associated with management
of certain federal grants.
The legislature further finds that the establishment of a
formal agricultural grant program and a revolving fund would
allow the department of agriculture and biosecurity to retain
these funds and cover a portion of the program costs. Funds
from the revolving fund would be used to search for additional
2026-3358 HB2246 CDl HMSO
IB■■illi■■Nill■lllllllll

Page 2 2246
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
grant opportunities, develop program applications to monitor
grant execution, ensure compliance with grant requirements, and
audit grant expenditures. Moneys in the fund will also be used
for consultant services and operational expenses.
The purpose of this Act is to establish an agricultural
grant program in the department of agriculture and biosecurity
and an agricultural grant revolving fund.
SECTION 2. Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding two new sections to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§141-A Agricultural grant program; established. (a)
There is established in the department of agriculture and
biosecurity an agricultural grant program to search for, apply
for, and administer federal agricultural grant opportunities
that could benefit the Hawaii agricultural industry.
(b) The department of agriculture and biosecurity may
retain and expend federal indirect overhead reimbursements for
grants as determined by the chairperson of the board of
agriculture and biosecurity.
§141-B Agricultural grant revolving fund. (a) There is
established in the state treasury an agricultural grant
2026-3358 HB2246 CDl HMSO

Page 3 2246
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
revolving fund into which shall be deposited the department of
agriculture and biosecurity's share of federal indirect overhead
reimbursements, pursuant to section 141-A.
(b) Moneys in the agricultural grant revolving fund shall
be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity to
search for discretionary grants, develop program applications to
secure additional revenues for the department of agriculture and
biosecurity, monitor grant execution, ensure compliance with
grant reguirements, and audit grant expenditures. Moneys in the
revolving fund may be expended for consultant services and
operational expenses, including the hiring of temporary staff.
(c) The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall
prepare and submit an annual report on the status of the
agricultural grant revolving fund to the legislature no later
than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session.
The annual report shall include but not be limited to a list of
federal agricultural grant applications submitted and grant
awards received."
SECTION 3. In codifying the new sections added by section
2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute
2026-3358 HB2246 CDl HMSO

■iiiuiiiiiiiiiiiimiiHiiniH

Page 4 2246
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating
the new sections in this Act.
SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3358 HB2246 CDl HMSO 4
liiiiuiiiinniNiiiin

2246
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 5th day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2246, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
—
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2246, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 1, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
18-26